Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.220

Electioneering communication. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or satellite television, radio transmission, digital communication, United States postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:

(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the candidate without using the candidate's name;

(b) Is broadcast, transmitted electronically or by other means, mailed, erected, distributed, or otherwise published within 60 days before any election for that office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election; and

(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the 60 days before an election, has a fair market value or cost of $1,000 or more.

(2) "Electioneering communication" does not include:

(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising appearing at least 12 months preceding the candidate becoming a candidate;

(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor, so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been invited to participate in the debate or forum;

(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news medium that is:

(i) Of interest to the public;

(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium; and

(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political or incidental committee;

(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;

(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works (i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract for such publications or media at least 12 months before becoming a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;

(f) Public service announcements;

(g) An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or contributors to a political party organization or political or incidental committee, or to the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership organization;

(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or

(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule consistent with the intent of this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 222.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.